Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1649
Lending agency, defined.

For purposes of sections 85-1647 and 85-1648, lending agency shall mean (1) any private postsecondary career school or (2) any entity (a) controlling, controlled by, or held in common ownership with such a school or (b) regularly lending money to such a school or to students of such a school.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 53;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 48;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2853;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 49.